Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 5. Miscellaneous and General Provisions.

Sec. 24.60.970.
Actions by the attorney general.

The attorney general may independently bring civil actions relating to violations under this chapter regardless of the outcome or settlement of a charge before the committee. This section does not prohibit the attorney general from bringing an action under another civil or criminal law.

History.

(§ 30 ch 127 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

24.60.178

.
Renumbered in 1992.

Sec. 24.60.980.
Cooperation by state agencies.

Each agency of the executive branch of state government shall, to the extent permitted by state or federal law, cooperate fully with the committee or a subcommittee by providing information and assistance, including disclosure of financial material and other records relating to a potential violation of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

24.60.180

. Renumbered in 1992.

Sec. 24.60.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“administrative action” means conduct related to the development, drafting, consideration, enactment, defeat, application, or interpretation of a rule, regulation, policy, or other action in a regulatory proceeding or a proceeding involving a license, permit, franchise, or entitlement for use;

“anything of value,” “benefit,” or “thing of value” includes all matters, whether tangible or intangible, that could reasonably be considered to be a material advantage, of material worth, use, or service to the person to whom it is conferred; the terms are intended to be interpreted broadly and encompass all matters that the recipient might find sufficiently desirable to do something in exchange for; “anything of value,” “benefit,” or “thing of value” does not include

an item listed in AS

24.60.080(a)(2)(B)

or (c);

campaign contributions, pledges, political endorsements, support in a political campaign, or a promise of endorsement or support;

contributions to a cause or organization, including a charity, made in response to a direct solicitation from a legislator or a person acting at the legislator’s direction; or

grants under AS

37.05.316

to named recipients;

“committee” means the Select Committee on Legislative Ethics and includes, when appropriate, the senate or house subcommittee;

“compensation” means remuneration for personal services rendered, including salary, fees, commissions, bonuses, and similar payments, but does not include reimbursement for actual expenses incurred by a person;

“domestic partner” means a person who is cohabiting with another person in a relationship that is like a marriage but that is not a legal marriage;

“immediate family” means

the spouse or domestic partner of the person; or

a parent, child, including a stepchild and an adopted child, and sibling of a person if the parent, child, or sibling resides with the person, is financially dependent on the person, or shares a substantial financial interest with the person;

“income” means an asset that a person has received or expects to receive, regardless of whether it is earned or unearned; inheritances and other gifts are not income;

“knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“legislative action” means conduct relating to the development, drafting, consideration, sponsorship, enactment or defeat, support or opposition to or of a law, amendment, resolution, report, nomination, or other matter affected by legislative action or inaction;

“legislative director” means the director of the legislative finance division, the legislative auditor, the director of the legislative research agency, the ombudsman, the victims’ advocate, the executive director of the Legislative Affairs Agency, and the directors of the divisions within the Legislative Affairs Agency;

“legislative employee” means a person, other than a legislator, who is compensated by the legislative branch in return for providing regular or substantial personal services, regardless of the person’s pay level or technical status as full time or part time; “legislative employee” does not include legislative interns, legislative volunteers, legislative consultants, legislative independent contractors, individuals who perform functions that are incidental to legislative functions, and other employees designated by the committee;

“lobbyist” means a person who is required to register under AS

24.45.041

and is described under AS

24.45.171

, but does not include a volunteer lobbyist described in AS

24.45.161(a)(1)

or a representational lobbyist as defined under regulations of the Alaska Public Offices Commission;

“political action” means conduct in which public officials, including legislators or legislative employees, use their official position or political contacts to exercise influence on state and local government employees or entities; it includes but is not limited to endorsing and pledging support or actively supporting a legislative matter, a nominee, or a candidate for public office;

“registered lobbyist” means a person who is required to register under AS

24.45.041

;

“representation” means action taken on behalf of another, whether for compensation or not, including but not limited to telephone calls and meetings and appearances at proceedings or meetings;

“state office” includes the office of governor, lieutenant governor, member of the legislature, or similar state office.

A person has a substantial interest in legislative, administrative, or political action if the person (1) is not a natural person and will be directly and substantially affected financially by a legislative, administrative, or political action; (2) is a natural person and will be directly and substantially affected financially by a legislative, administrative, or political action in a way that is greater than the effect on a substantial class of persons to which the person belongs as a member of a profession, occupation, industry, or region; (3) has or seeks contracts in excess of $10,000 annually for goods or services with the legislature or with an agency of the state; or (4) is a lobbyist. For the purpose of this subsection, the state, the federal government, and an agency, corporation, or other entity of or owned by the state or federal government do not have a substantial interest in legislative, administrative, or political action.

History.

(§ 31 ch 127 SLA 1992; am §§ 64, 65 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 17 ch 92 SLA 2001; am §§ 32, 33, 41 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 7 ch 115 SLA 2003; am §§ 47, 48 ch 47 SLA 2007; am § 17 ch 45 SLA 2012; am § 13 ch 9 SLA 2014; am § 3 ch 29 SLA 2016; am § 11 ch 61 SLA 2018; am § 6 ch 5 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2003 and 2019, the paragraphs in (a) were renumbered to maintain alphabetical order.

Administrative Code. —

For legislative financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective April 23, 2014, in (a)(6) [now (a)(7)], substituted “an adopted child” for “an adoptive child”.

The 2016 amendment, effective September 20, 2016, in (a)(11) [now (a)(12)], inserted “providing” preceding “regular”; substituted “full time or part time; 'legislative employee'” for “a full-time or part-time employee, independent contractor, or consultant; it includes public members and staff of the committee;” following “technical status as”, inserted “legislative interns, legislative volunteers, legislative consultants, legislative independent contractors,” preceding “individuals who perform”.

The 2018 amendment, effective July 20, 2018, added (a)(17) [now (a)(16)]. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 17, ch. 61, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 19, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 20, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

The 2019 amendment, effective May 25, 2019, repealed (a)(6), which defined “financial interest”.

Editor's notes. —

For provision relating to the severability of the 2018 amendment to this section, see sec. 15, ch. 61, SLA 2018 in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 24.60.995.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Legislative Ethics Act.

History.

(§ 18 ch 12 SLA 2006)